California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 825, Sec. 1.   Effective September 15, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

6006.5.

“Occasional sale” includes all of the following:

(a) A sale of property not held or used by a seller in the course of activities for which he or she is required to hold a seller’s permit or permits or would be required to hold a seller’s permit or permits if the activities were conducted in this state, provided that the sale is not one of a series of sales sufficient in number, scope, and character to constitute an activity for which he or she is required to hold a seller’s permit or would be
 required to hold a seller’s permit if the activity were conducted in this state.

(b) Any transfer of all or substantially all the property held or used by a person in the course of those activities when after the transfer the real or ultimate ownership of the property is substantially similar to that which existed before the transfer. For the purposes of this section, stockholders, bondholders, partners, or other persons holding an ownership interest in a corporation or other entity are regarded as having the “real or ultimate ownership” of the property of the corporation or other entity.

(c) A sale of property, other than hay, by a producer of hay, provided that the sale is not one of a series of sales sufficient in number, scope, or character to constitute an activity for which the producer would be required to hold a seller’s permit if the producer were not also selling
 hay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 903, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6006.6.

“Sale” includes any sale at an auction in respect to tangible personal property which is sold to a successful bidder at the auction upon an agreement or understanding at the time of the sale that the property involved either will not be delivered to the successful bidder or that any amount which he may pay for the property pursuant to the sale will be returned to him. The tax shall be computed in such case upon the amount of the successful bid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1482.)
-------------------------------------------

6007.

(a) (1) A “retail sale” or “sale at retail” means a sale for a purpose other than resale in the regular course of business in the form of tangible personal property.

(2) When tangible personal property is delivered by an owner or former owner thereof, or by a factor or agent of that owner, former owner, or factor to a
 consumer or to a person for redelivery to a consumer, pursuant to a retail sale made by a retailer not engaged in business in this state, the person making the delivery shall be deemed the retailer of that property. He or she shall include the retail selling price of the property in his or her gross receipts or sales price.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a “retail sale” or “sale at retail” shall include a sale by a convicted seller of tangible personal property with a counterfeit mark, a counterfeit label, or an illicit label on that property, or in connection with that sale, regardless of whether the sale is for resale in the regular course of business.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, all of the following shall apply:

(A) A “convicted seller” means a person convicted of a
 counterfeiting offense, including, but not limited to, a violation under Section 350 or 653w of the Penal Code or Section 2318, 2319, or 2320 of Title 18 of the United States Code on or after the date of sale.

(B) “Counterfeit mark” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 2320 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(C) “Counterfeit label” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 2318 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(D) “Illicit label” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 2318 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(E) Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of, and Article 1 (commencing with Section 17500) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 7 of, the Business and
 Professions Code, and Title 1.5 (commencing with Section 1750) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code shall not apply to any person other than a convicted seller.

(F) Notwithstanding Article 2 (commencing with Section 6481) of Chapter 5, any notice of deficiency determination to a convicted seller shall be mailed within one year after the last day of the calendar month following the date of conviction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 427, Sec. 2.   (AB 160)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6007.5.

A sale of tangible personal property to a contractor or subcontractor for use in the performance of contracts with the United States for the construction of improvements on or to real property in this State is a retail sale. The gross receipts from such a sale or the sales price of property so sold shall be included in the measure of the taxes imposed by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 795.)
-------------------------------------------

6008.

“Storage” includes any keeping or retention in this State for any purpose except sale in the regular course of business or subsequent use solely outside this State of tangible personal property purchased from a retailer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6009.

“Use” includes the exercise of any right or power over tangible personal property incident to the ownership of that property, and also includes the possession of, or the exercise of any right or power over, tangible personal property by a lessee under a lease, except that it does not include the sale of that property in the regular course of business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 2.   Superseded January 1, 2027; see amendment by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

6009.

(a) “Use” includes the exercise of any right or power over tangible personal property incident to the ownership of that property, and also includes the possession of, or the exercise of any right or power over, tangible personal property by a lessee under a lease, except that it does not include the sale of that property in the regular course of business.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), the exercise of any right or power over tangible personal property incident to the ownership of that property includes opening, viewing, accessing, downloading, copying, updating,
 possessing, storing, or manipulating a digital product transferred electronically or accessed remotely.

(c) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 3.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6009.1.

“Storage” and “use” do not include the keeping, retaining or exercising any right or power over tangible personal property for the purpose of subsequently transporting it outside the state for use thereafter solely outside the state, or for the purpose of being processed, fabricated, or manufactured into, attached to or incorporated into, other tangible personal property to be transported outside the state and thereafter used solely outside the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 546, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6009.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 6008, 6009, and 6009.1, “storage” and “use” each shall include a purchase by a convicted purchaser of tangible personal property with a counterfeit mark, a counterfeit label, or an illicit label on that property, or in connection with that purchase, regardless of whether the purchase is for resale in the regular course of business.

(b) “Convicted purchaser” means a person convicted of a counterfeiting offense, including, but not limited to, a violation under Section 350 or 653w of the Penal Code or Section 2318, 2319, or 2320 of Title 18 of the United States Code on or after the date of purchase.

(c) For purposes of this section, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of, and Article 1 (commencing with Section 17500) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 7 of, the Business and Professions Code, and Title 1.5 (commencing with Section 1750) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code shall not apply to any person other than a convicted seller.

(d) “Counterfeit mark” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 2320 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(e) “Counterfeit label” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 2318 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(f) “Illicit label” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 2318 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(g) Notwithstanding Article 2 (commencing with Section 6481) of Chapter 5, any notice of deficiency determination to a convicted purchaser shall be mailed within one year after the last day of the calendar month following the date of conviction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 427, Sec. 3.   (AB 160)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6009.5.

(a) For purposes of the use tax liability imposed pursuant to Sections 6052 and 6201.55, “storage” and “use” do not include the keeping, retaining, or exercising of any right or power over a digital product for the purpose of installing or deploying the digital product for use thereafter solely outside the state.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 4.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6010.

“Purchase” means and includes:

(a) Any transfer of title or possession, exchange, or barter, conditional or otherwise, in any manner or by any means whatsoever, of tangible personal property for a consideration. “Transfer of possession” includes only transactions found by the board to be in lieu of a transfer of title, exchange, or barter.

(b) When performed outside this state or when the customer gives a resale certificate pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 6091) of Chapter 2, the
 producing, fabricating, processing, printing, or imprinting of tangible personal property for a consideration for consumers who furnish either directly or indirectly the materials used in the producing, fabricating, processing, printing, or imprinting.

(c) A transaction whereby the possession of property is transferred but the seller retains the title as security for the payment of the price.

(d) A transfer for a consideration of tangible personal property which has been produced, fabricated, or printed to the special order of the customer, or of any publication.

(e) Any lease of tangible personal property in any manner or by any means whatsoever, for consideration, except a lease of:

(1) Motion pictures or animated motion pictures, including
 television, films, and tapes.

(2) Linen supplies and similar articles when an essential part of the lease agreement is the furnishing of the recurring service of laundering or cleaning the articles.

(3) Household furnishings with a lease of the living quarters in which they are to be used.

(4) Mobile transportation equipment for use in transportation of persons or property as defined in Section 6023.

(5) Tangible personal property leased in substantially the same form as acquired by the lessor or leased in substantially the same form as acquired by a transferor, as to which the lessor or transferor has paid sales tax reimbursement or has paid use tax measured by the purchase price of the property. For purposes of this paragraph, “transferor” shall mean
 the following:

(A) A person from whom the lessor acquired the property in a transaction described in subdivision (b) of Section 6006.5.

(B) A decedent from whom the lessor acquired the property by will or the laws of succession.

(6) A mobilehome, as defined in Sections 18008 and 18211 of the Health and Safety Code, other than a mobilehome originally sold new prior to July 1, 1980, and not subject to local property taxation.

(7) Paragraphs (1) and (5) and Section 6094.1 shall not apply to rentals or leases of video cassettes, video tapes, and video discs for private use under which the lessee or renter does not obtain or acquire the right to license, broadcast, exhibit, or reproduce the video cassette, video tape, or video disc.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 915, Sec. 4.   Effective September 21, 1987.   Superseded January 1, 2027; see amendment by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

6010.

“Purchase” means and includes:

(a) Any transfer of title or possession, exchange, or barter, conditional or otherwise, in any manner or by any means whatsoever, of tangible personal property for a consideration. “Transfer of possession” includes only transactions found by the department to be in lieu of a transfer of title, exchange, or barter.

(b) When performed outside this state or when the customer gives a resale certificate pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 6091) of Chapter 2, the producing, fabricating, processing, printing, or imprinting of tangible personal property for a consideration for consumers who furnish either directly or indirectly the materials used in the producing, fabricating, processing, printing, or imprinting.

(c) A transaction whereby the possession of property is transferred but the seller retains the title as security for the payment of the price.

(d) A transfer for a consideration
 of tangible personal property which has been produced, fabricated, or printed to the special order of the customer, or of any publication.

(e) Any lease of tangible personal property in any manner or by any means whatsoever, for consideration, except a lease of:

(1) Motion pictures or animated motion pictures, including television, films, and tapes.

(2) Linen supplies and similar articles when an essential part of the lease agreement is the furnishing of the recurring service of laundering or cleaning the articles.

(3) Household furnishings with a lease of the living quarters in which they are to be used.

(4) Mobile transportation equipment for use in transportation of persons or property
 as defined in Section 6023.

(5) Tangible personal property leased in substantially the same form as acquired by the lessor or leased in substantially the same form as acquired by a transferor, as to which the lessor or transferor has paid sales tax reimbursement or has paid use tax measured by the purchase price of the property. For purposes of this paragraph, “transferor” shall mean the following:

(A) A person from whom the lessor acquired the property in a transaction described in subdivision (b) of Section 6006.5.

(B) A decedent from whom the lessor acquired the property by will or the laws of succession.

(6) A mobilehome, as defined in Sections 18008 and 18211 of the Health and Safety Code, other than a mobilehome originally sold new prior to July
 1, 1980, and not subject to local property taxation.

(7) Paragraphs (1) and (5) and Section 6094.1 shall not apply to rentals or leases of video cassettes, video tapes, and video discs for private use under which the lessee or renter does not obtain or acquire the right to license, broadcast, exhibit, or reproduce the video cassette, video tape, or video disc.

(f) Any transfer of title or possession, exchange, or barter, conditional or otherwise, in any manner or by any means whatsoever, of a digital product transferred on tangible storage media for a consideration.

(g) Any permanent or temporary transfer of the right, in any
 manner or by any means whatsoever, to open, view, access, download, copy, update, possess, store, manipulate, or otherwise use a digital product transferred electronically or accessed remotely for a consideration, beginning January 1, 2027.

(h) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 5.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6010.1.

The possession of tangible personal property by a lessee, or by another person at the direction of the lessee, is a continuing purchase for use in this state by the lessee as respects any period of time the leased property is situated in this state, irrespective of the time or place of delivery of the property to the lessee or such other person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6010.3.

“Sale” and “purchase,” for the purposes of this part, do not include (a) the fabrication or transfer by a typographer of composed type or reproduction proofs thereof for use in the preparation of printed matter, or (b) the fabrication or transfer of such reproduction proofs or impressed mats when the fabrication is for, and the transfer is to, a printer or publisher for use in printing.

The foregoing provisions shall not apply to the fabrication or transfer of a “pasteup,” “mechanical” or “assembly” of which a reproduction proof is a component part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1061.)
-------------------------------------------

6010.4.

If two or more persons engaged in the production and distribution of motion pictures for use in any media form a partnership for the purpose of reducing the cost of producing motion pictures through the sharing of the use of equipment, studio facilities and the services of personnel, the furnishing (without transferring title to tangible personal property) of such equipment, facilities and services by the partnership to its members for the purpose of the production of motion pictures by its members shall not constitute either a “sale” or “purchase.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 640.)
-------------------------------------------

6010.5.

For the purposes of this part, the place of the sale or purchase of tangible personal property is the place where the property is physically located at the time the act constituting the sale or purchase, as defined in this part, takes place.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1960.   Superseded January 1, 2027; see amendment by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

6010.5.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), for the purposes of this part, the place of the sale or purchase of tangible personal property is the place where the property is physically located at the time the act constituting the sale or purchase, as defined in this part, takes place.

(b) (1) For a digital product transferred on tangible storage media, the place of the sale or purchase of that digital product shall be the place where the tangible storage
 media is physically located at the time the act constituting the sale or purchase takes place.

(2) If the sale or purchase of a digital product that is not transferred on tangible storage media is an in-person sale or purchase at a location of the seller for which the seller is required to hold a seller’s permit pursuant to Section 6066, the place of the sale or purchase of the digital product transferred electronically or accessed remotely shall be the seller’s place of business in this state where the in-person sale or purchase occurred.

(3) (A) If the sale or purchase of a digital product that is not transferred on tangible storage media is not
 an in-person sale or purchase, the place of the sale or purchase of a digital product transferred electronically or accessed remotely shall be deemed to be the purchaser’s known address in this state shown in the seller’s records maintained in good faith in the ordinary course of business.

(B) If the purchaser provided more than one address to the seller during the consummation of the sale or purchase, the purchaser’s known address shall be determined from those addresses in this state in the following order of priority:

(i) The purchaser’s billing address.

(ii) The purchaser’s shipping or delivery address.

(iii) The mailing address associated with the purchaser’s payment instrument.

(iv) The purchaser’s mailing address.

(C) If a purchaser does not provide an address to the seller during the consummation of the sale or purchase, the purchaser’s known address in this state shall be determined from the addresses in this state the purchaser previously provided to the seller in the following order
 of priority:

(i) The purchaser’s most recent billing address.

(ii) The purchaser’s most recent shipping or delivery address.

(iii) The purchaser’s most recent mailing address associated with the purchaser’s payment instrument.

(iv) The purchaser’s most recent mailing address.

(4) If neither paragraph (2) or (3) apply, the place of the sale or purchase of a digital product transferred electronically or accessed remotely shall be deemed to be outside of this state.

(c) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 6.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6010.5.1.

(a) The place of use of a digital product shall be the place where any right or power is exercised over the digital product. The right or power to remotely access a digital product is exercised at the place where the person accessing the digital product is located.

(b) It shall be presumed that a digital product that was purchased outside of this state, as determined pursuant to Section 6010.5, and used in this state within 90 days from the date of sale or purchase was purchased for storage, use, or other consumption in this state.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 7.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6010.6.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), “sale” and “purchase,” for the purposes of this part, do not include any of the following:

(1) The performance of any qualified production services in connection with the production of all or any part of any qualified motion picture. Persons performing those qualified production services are consumers of paintings, models, and art work used by those filming special effects, titles, or credits, and of film, tape, or other embodiment upon which sound, visual images, or computer-generated graphics are
 created or recorded, notwithstanding that title to the property may be transferred pursuant to the qualified production services contract.

(2) Any transfer of all or any part of any qualified motion picture, or any interest therein or any rights relating thereto, under either of the following circumstances:

(A) The transfer is made prior to the date that the qualified motion picture is exhibited or broadcast to its general audience.

(B) The transfer is made to any person or persons holding, either directly or indirectly, or by affiliation, any exploitation rights obtained prior to the date that the qualified motion picture is exhibited or broadcast to its general audience.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Motion picture” means any audiovisual work (at any stage of the production thereof) consisting of a series of related images, either on film, tape, or other embodiment, whether photographic, or otherwise, and for these purposes, includes all physical materials comprising part of, or synchronized with, the motion picture, including the original, duplicate, and other negatives, intermediary film products, tapes, prints and original, duplicate, and other sound or visual recordings created to accompany the pictorial material depicted in the motion picture.

(2) “Produce or production of any qualified motion picture” means to originate, create, invent, design, devise, develop, photograph, edit, record, imprint, adapt, alter, make, process, fabricate, assemble, construct, or manufacture all or any part of that qualified motion picture by any means, method, or devise of any kind or
 character, whether before or after commencement of principal photography.

(3) “Qualified motion picture” means any motion picture, whether or not the production of that motion picture is completely finished, which is produced, adapted, or altered for exploitation in, on, or through any medium or by any device, including, but not limited to, a motion picture produced for exploitation in movie theaters, through any form of television, or videocassettes, videotapes, or videodiscs, in amusement parks, or on commercial carriers, for any purpose, including, but not limited to, for any entertainment, commercial, advertising, promotional, industrial, or educational purpose. Qualified motion picture includes, but is not limited to, all adapted versions thereof (whether adapted for exploitation in any language, for any media, or otherwise) creative advertising, and publicity materials, such as trailers, television spots, or featurettes. Qualified motion
 picture does not include motion pictures produced for private noncommercial use, such as weddings or graduations.

(4) “Qualified production services” means any fabrication performed by any person in any capacity (whether as an employee, agent, independent contractor, or otherwise) on film, tape, or other audiovisual embodiment in connection with the production of all or any part of any qualified motion picture, including, but not limited to, photography, sound, music, special effects, animation, adaptation (language, media, electronic, or otherwise), technological modifications, computer graphics, dubbing, mixing, editing, or cutting services. “Qualified production services” do not include services or other work to manufacture release prints or to duplicate tapes for exhibition or broadcast.

(5) “Transfer” means any change of title or possession in any manner or form by any means
 whatsoever, conditional or otherwise, including, but not limited to, any sale, assignment, exchange, lease, license, or barter.

(6) “Rights relating to any qualified motion picture” includes, but is not limited to, any and all rights to produce or exploit all or any part of the qualified motion picture by any means and in or through any medium.

(7) “Exploit” or “exploitation” with respect to any qualified motion picture includes, but is not limited to, exhibiting, broadcasting, telecasting, displaying, projecting, transmitting, duplicating, reproducing, distributing, promoting, advertising, commercializing, merchandising, marketing, or otherwise using all or any part of the qualified motion picture in any or all media markets and territories and by any or all means, methods, modes, processes, and devices or delivery systems of every kind and character. “Exploitation” includes each
 and every act comprising part of any phase of the process of exploiting all or any qualified motion picture, whether before or after commencement of principal photography.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) Any sale or purchase of raw film or videotape stock.

(2) Any sale or purchase of release prints or tapes for exhibition or broadcast.

(3) Any rentals or leases of videocassettes, videotapes, or videodiscs for private use, as described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (g) of Section 6006 and paragraph (7) of subdivision (e) of Section 6010.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1157, Sec. 1.   Effective September 22, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

6010.65.

(a) “Sale” and “purchase,” for purposes of this part, do not include any transfer of title to, nor any lease of, tangible personal property pursuant to an acquisition sale and leaseback. An acquisition sale and leaseback is a sale by a person and leaseback to that person of tangible personal property where both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) That person has paid sales tax reimbursement or use tax with respect to that person’s purchase of the property.

(2) The acquisition sale and leaseback is consummated within 90 days of that person’s first functional use of the property.

(b) “Sale” and “purchase” include, for purposes of this part, the transfer of title to a lessee upon termination of an acquisition sale and leaseback.

(c) This section shall apply to acquisition sale and leaseback arrangements executed on or after the operative date of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 286, Sec. 1.   Effective July 21, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6010.7.

Paragraph (5) of subdivision (g) of Section 6006, paragraph (5) of subdivision (e) of Section 6010, and Section 6094.1 shall have no application to a lease of a chemical toilet unit. Such a lease is a “sale” and “purchase” and the taxes imposed by this part apply measured by the lease or rental price accordingly, regardless of whether the unit is leased in substantially the same form as acquired and regardless of whether sales tax or use tax has been paid with respect to the chemical toilets at the time of their acquisition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1211.)
-------------------------------------------

6010.8.

(a) (1) “Sale” and “purchase” do not include any lease or transfer of title of tangible personal property constituting any project to any participating party.

(2) On and after September 21, 2018, “sale” and “purchase” do not include any lease or transfer of title of tangible personal property constituting any project to any contractor for use in the performance of a construction contract for the participating party that will use that property as an integral part of the approved project.

(b) As used in this section, “project” has the meaning specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (8) of
 subdivision (a) of Section 26003 of the Public Resources Code and “participating party” has the meaning specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 26003 of the Public Resources Code.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 690, Sec. 14) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 211, Sec. 6.   (SB 86)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 7 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 211.)
-------------------------------------------

6010.8.

(a) “Sale” and “purchase” do not include any lease or transfer of title of tangible personal property constituting any project to any participating party. As used in this section, “project” has the meaning specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 26003 of the Public Resources Code and “participating party” has the meaning specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 26003 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 690, Sec. 15) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 211, Sec. 7.   (SB 86)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6010.9.

“Sale” and “purchase,” for the purposes of this part, do not include the design, development, writing, translation, fabrication, lease, or transfer for a consideration of title or possession, of a custom computer program, other than a basic operational program (as defined in Section 995.2), either in the form of written procedures or in the form of storage media on which, or in which, the program is recorded, or any required documentation or manuals designed to facilitate the use of the custom computer program so transferred.

As used in this section:

(a) “Storage media” includes punched cards, tapes, discs, diskettes, or drums on which computer programs may be embodied or stored.

(b) “Computer” does not include tape-controlled automatic drilling, milling, or other manufacturing machinery or equipment.

(c) “Computer program” means the complete plan for the solution of a problem, such as the complete sequence of automatic data-processing equipment instructions necessary to solve a problem and includes both systems and application programs and subdivisions, such as assemblers, compilers, routines, generators, and utility programs.

(d) “Custom computer program” means a computer program prepared to the special order of the customer and includes those services represented by separately stated charges for
 modifications to an existing prewritten program which are prepared to the special order of the customer. The term does not include a “canned” or prewritten computer program which is held or existing for general or repeated sale or lease, even if the prewritten or “canned” program was initially developed on a custom basis or for in-house use. Modification to an existing prewritten program to meet the customer’s needs is custom computer programming only to the extent of the modification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1274, Sec. 2.   Effective September 22, 1982.   Superseded January 1, 2027; see amendment by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

6010.9.

(a) “Sale” and “purchase,” for the purposes of this part, do not include the design, development, writing, translation, fabrication, lease, or transfer for a consideration of title or possession, of custom computer software, other than a basic operational program, either in the form of written procedures or in the form of tangible storage media on which, or in which, the custom computer software is recorded, or any required documentation or manuals designed to facilitate the use of the custom computer software so transferred.

(b) As used in this section:

(1) “Basic operational program” has the meaning defined in Section 995.2.

(2) “Computer” means an electronic device, including word processing equipment, that is programmable and includes a processor (CPU) and internal memory.

(3) “Computer software” means a set of coded instructions designed to cause a computer or automatic data processing equipment to perform a task.

(4) (A) “Custom computer software” means computer software prepared to the special order of a single customer and includes those services represented by separately stated charges for modifications to existing prewritten computer software that are prepared to the special order of the customer.

(B) “Custom computer software” does not include prewritten computer software that is held or existing for general or repeated sale or lease, even if the prewritten computer software was initially developed on a custom basis or for in-house use. Modification to existing prewritten computer software to meet the customer’s needs is custom computer software only to the extent of the modification.

(c) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 8.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6010.10.

(a) “Sale” and “purchase,” for the purposes of this part, do not include any transfer of title of tangible personal property constituting any project or pollution control facility to the Capital Programs and Climate Financing Authority by any participating party, nor any lease or transfer of title of tangible personal property constituting any project or pollution control facility by the authority to any participating party, when the transfer or lease is made pursuant to Division 27 (commencing with Section 44500) of the Health and Safety Code. The terms “project,” “pollution control
 facility,” and “participating party” as used in this section have the meanings ascribed to them in Sections 44506 and 44508 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) This section shall only apply to a project or pollution control facility that is a “project” or “pollution control facility” as defined in Section 44508 of the Health and Safety Code as amended by Chapter 756 of the Statutes of 1999.

(c) This section shall not apply to a project for which the authority refunds bonds or evidences of indebtedness not originally issued by the authority, and the authority makes a finding that the project being refinanced qualifies as a project under Division 27 (commencing with Section 44500) of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 710, Sec. 19.   (AB 786)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6010.11.

“Sale” and “purchase,” for the purpose of this part, do not include any transfer of a qualified mass commuting vehicle pursuant to a safe harbor lease arrangement described in Section 168(f)(8) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended by Section 208 of Public Law 97-248, Section 5 of Public Law 97-354, and Section 102 of Public Law 97-448, or pursuant to a sale-leaseback or lease-leaseback arrangement which includes a safe harbor lease arrangement. For purposes of this section, “qualified mass commuting vehicle” means a qualified mass commuting vehicle as defined in Section 103(b)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code of
 1954.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1511, Sec. 1.   Effective September 28, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

6010.15.

(a) “Sale” and “purchase” for the purposes of this part do not include the transfer of title to vested property by a pawnbroker to a person who pledged the property to the pawnbroker as security for a loan and from whom title to the property transferred to the pawnbroker pursuant to Section 21201 of the Financial Code, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The transfer occurs no more than six months after title to the property transferred to the pawnbroker from the person pursuant to Section 21201 of the Financial Code.

(2) As consideration for the transfer of the property, the person is required to pay the
 pawnbroker only the remaining unpaid balance of the loan, including accrued charges and interest, as of the date the pawnbroker becomes vested with title to the property, together with one of the following:

(A) For an original loan amount not exceeding two thousand four hundred ninety-nine dollars and ninety-nine cents ($2,499.99), charges and interest allowable under the loan pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 21200) of Division 8 of the Financial Code, from the date the pawnbroker is vested with title to the property to the date of the transfer to the person who pledged the property.

(B) For an original loan amount of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or more, charges and interest due in accordance with the last monthly contractual interest rate, from the date
 the pawnbroker is vested with title to the property until the date of the transfer to the person who pledged the property.

(3) The person has proof, such as a receipt or similar document provided to the purchaser, that the person originally paid sales tax on the item.

(b) As used in this section:

(1) “Pawnbroker” has the meaning described in Section 21000 of the Financial Code.

(2) “Vested property” has the meaning described in subdivision (b) of Section 21002 of the Financial Code.

(c) This section shall become inoperative on
 January 1, 2032.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 76, Sec. 1.   (AB 2641)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Inoperative January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)